Massachusetts, session 194th, H1379.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 51A of Chapter 118E of the Massachusetts General Laws, is hereby amended in 
paragraph (a) by striking the definition of “Step Therapy Protocol” and inserting in place thereof 
the following new definition: -- 
“Step Therapy Protocol”, a utilization management policy or program that establishes the 
specific sequence in which a prescription drug for a specified medical condition is covered by 
the division or an entity with which the division contracts to provide or manage health insurance 
benefits; provided, however, the provisions of such utilization management policy or program 
and any regulations requiring prior authorization for prescription drugs shall not apply to any 
medications prescribed by a health care provider for the treatment of opioid use disorder.